Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5768.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 309. (1) Before Subject to subsection (11), before
issuing a license, the secretary of state shall examine each
applicant for an operator's or chauffeur's license who at the time
of the application is not the holder of a valid, unrevoked
operator's or chauffeur's license under a law of this state
providing for the licensing of drivers. Before the secretary of
state authorizes an individual to administer vehicle group
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


designation or endorsement knowledge tests, that individual must
successfully complete both a state and Federal Bureau of
Investigation fingerprint-based criminal history check or the
equivalent through the department of state police. In all other
cases, the secretary of state may waive the examination, except
that an examination must not be waived if it appears from the
application, from the apparent physical or mental condition of the
applicant, or from any other information that has come to the
secretary of state from another source, that the applicant does not
possess the physical, mental, or other qualifications necessary to
operate a motor vehicle in a manner as not to jeopardize the safety
of persons or property, or that the applicant is not entitled to a
license under section 303. A licensee who applies for the renewal
of his or her the applicant's license by mail under section 307
shall certify to his or her the applicant's physical capability to
operate a motor vehicle. The secretary of state may check the
applicant's driving record through the National Driver Register and
the Commercial Driver's License Information System before issuing a
license under this section.
(2) The secretary of state may appoint sheriffs, their
deputies, the chiefs of police of cities and villages that have
organized police departments within this state, their duly
authorized representatives, employees of the secretary of state, or
the secretary of state's duly authorized representatives as
examining officers for the purpose of examining applicants for
operator's and chauffeur's licenses. An examining officer shall
conduct examinations of applicants for operator's and chauffeur's
licenses in accordance with this chapter and the rules promulgated
by the secretary of state under subsection (3). After conducting an
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


examination an examining officer shall make a written report of his
or her the examining officer's findings and recommendations to the
secretary of state.
(3) The secretary of state shall promulgate rules under the
administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to
24.328, for the examination of the applicant's physical and mental
qualifications to operate a motor vehicle in a manner as not to
jeopardize the safety of persons or property, and shall ascertain
whether facts exist that would bar the issuance of a license under
section 303. The secretary of state may consider a written medical
report and recommendation submitted under section 5139 of the
public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.5139, from the personal
physician or optometrist of an applicant, in making the examination
regarding the applicant's physical and mental qualifications to
operate a motor vehicle under this section and R 257.851 to R
257.855 of the Michigan Administrative Code. A report received by
the secretary of state from a physician or an optometrist under
this section is confidential. The secretary of state shall also
ascertain whether the applicant has sufficient knowledge of the
English language to understand highway warnings or direction signs
written in that language. The examination must not include
investigation of facts other than those facts directly pertaining
to the ability of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle with
safety or facts declared to be prerequisite to the issuance of a
license under this act.
(4) The Subject to subsection (11), the secretary of state
shall not issue an original operator's or chauffeur's license
without a vehicle group designation or indorsement endorsement
without an examination that includes a driving skills test
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


conducted by the secretary of state or by a designated examining
officer under subsection (2) or section 310e. The secretary of
state may enter into an agreement with another public or private
corporation or agency to conduct a driving skills test conducted
under this section. Before the secretary of state authorizes an
individual to administer a corporation's or agency's driver skills
testing operations or authorizes an examiner to conduct a driving
skills test, that individual or examiner must successfully complete
both a state and Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint-based
criminal history check through the department of state police as
required by law and as provided under 49 CFR 384.228. In an
agreement with another public or private corporation or agency to
conduct a driving skills test, the secretary of state shall
prescribe the method and examination criteria to be followed by the
corporation, agency, or examiner when conducting the driving skills
test and the form of the certification to be issued to an
individual who satisfactorily completes a driving skills test. An
original vehicle group designation or indorsement endorsement must
not be issued by the secretary of state without a knowledge test
conducted by the secretary of state. Except as provided in section
312f(1), an original vehicle group designation or passenger or
school bus indorsement endorsement must not be issued by the
secretary of state without a driving skills test conducted by an
examiner appointed or authorized by the secretary of state or an
equivalent driving skills test meeting the requirements of 49 CFR
part 383 conducted in another jurisdiction.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this act and subject to
subsection (11), the secretary of state may waive the requirement
of a driving skills test, knowledge test, or road sign test of an
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


applicant for an original operator's or chauffeur's license without
a vehicle group designation or indorsement endorsement who at the
time of the application is the holder of a valid, unrevoked
operator's or chauffeur's license issued by another state or
country.
(6) A driving skills test conducted under this section must
include a behind-the-wheel road test. Before conducting a behind-
the-wheel road test for an applicant seeking a vehicle group
designation, including any upgrade to a vehicle group designation,
or for any indorsement endorsement required to operate a commercial
motor vehicle, the examiner shall determine that the applicant was
issued his or her the applicant's commercial learner's permit not
less than 14 days before the date of that test and that he or she
the applicant has that permit in his or her the applicant's
possession.
(7) A person who corrupts or attempts to corrupt a designated
examining officer appointed or designated by the secretary of state
under this section or section 310e by giving, offering, or
promising any gift or gratuity with the intent to influence the
opinion or decision of the examining officer conducting the test is
guilty of a felony.
(8) A designated examining officer appointed or designated by
the secretary of state who conducts a driving skills test under an
agreement entered into under this section or section 310e and who
varies from, shortens, or in any other way changes the method or
examination criteria prescribed in that agreement in conducting a
driving skills test is guilty of a felony.
(9) A person who forges, counterfeits, or alters a
satisfactorily completed driving skills test certification issued
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


by a designated examining officer appointed or designated by the
secretary of state under this section or section 310e is guilty of
a felony.
(10) The secretary of state shall waive the requirement of a
written knowledge test, road sign test, and driving skills test of
an applicant for an original motorcycle endorsement if the person
has successfully passed a motorcycle safety course approved by the
department as described in sections 811a and 811b.
(11) An operator's or chauffeur's license that expires on or
after March 1, 2020 is valid until March 31, 2021. An operator's or
chauffeur's license that expires after March 31, 2021 but before
August 1, 2021 is valid until 120 days after the date of the
expiration.Beginning January 1, 2028, before issuing an operator's
license to an applicant, the secretary of state shall verify that
that applicant has completed a work zone safety course that meets
the requirements of section 309a. The secretary of state shall
waive this requirement if the applicant is the holder of a valid,
unrevoked operator's or chauffeur's license issued by another state
or country.
Sec. 309a. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, in addition to the
requirements under this act, all applicants for an operator's
license must complete a work zone safety education course that is
approved by the department and meets the following requirements:
(a) The department has consulted with the state transportation
department about the content of the work zone safety education
course.
(b) The work zone safety education course consists of not less
than 30 minutes of education delivered through either of the
following formats:
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


(i) An online format approved by the department.
(ii) In-person instruction as part of a driver education course
under the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA
384, MCL 256.621 to 256.705.
(c) The work zone safety education course must include, but is
not limited to, the following topics:
(i) Instruction on identifying and navigating highway
construction and maintenance zones.
(ii) Education on the safety precautions necessary to protect
both drivers and workers in work zones.
(iii) Information on the legal requirements and penalties
associated with traffic violations in work zones.
(iv) Strategies for safe driving behavior in the presence of
construction equipment and personnel.
(2) Successful completion of the work zone safety education
course described in subsection (1) must be documented and submitted
to the department prior to the issuance of an operator's license to
an applicant.
(3) The department shall adopt a standardized curriculum for
the work zone safety education course and ensure that it is
consistent across all delivery methods. The department may approve
and utilize existing driver education curriculum materials,
including, but not limited to, the AAA driver education curriculum,
if the curriculum is determined appropriate by the department and
meets the requirements of this section.
(4) The department may collaborate with the state
transportation department, law enforcement agencies, and other
stakeholders to update and enhance the course content regularly.
(5) The work zone safety education course must be provided to
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


participants in a driver education course authorized under the
driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL
256.621 to 256.705, at no additional cost to the participants.
Sec. 310e. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act, an
operator's or chauffeur's license issued to a person an individual
who is 17 years of age or less shall must be in a form as
prescribed in section 310, and valid only upon on the issuance of a
graduated driver license.
(2) The secretary of state shall designate graduated licensing
provisions in a manner that clearly indicates that the person
individual is subject to the appropriate provisions described in
this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in section 303, a person an
individual who is not less than 14 years and 9 months of age may be
issued a level 1 graduated licensing status to operate a motor
vehicle if the person individual has satisfied all of the following
conditions:
(a) Passed a vision test and met health standards as
prescribed by the secretary of state.
(b) Successfully completed segment 1 of a driver education
course as that term is defined in section 7 of the driver education
provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.627, including a
minimum of 6 hours of on-the-road driving time with the instructor.
(c) Received written approval of a parent or legal guardian.
(4) A person An individual issued a level 1 graduated
licensing status may operate a motor vehicle only when accompanied
either by a licensed parent or legal guardian or, with the
permission of the parent or legal guardian, a licensed driver 21
years of age or older. Except as otherwise provided in this
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


section, a person an individual is restricted to operating a motor
vehicle with a level 1 graduated licensing status for not less than
6 months.
(5) A person An individual may be issued a level 2 graduated
licensing status to operate a motor vehicle if the person
individual has satisfied all of the following conditions:
(a) Had a level 1 graduated licensing status for not less than
6 months.
(b) Successfully completed segment 2 of a driver education
course as that term is defined in section 7 of the driver education
provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.627.
(c) Not incurred a moving violation resulting in a conviction
or civil infraction determination or been involved in an accident
for which the official police report indicates a moving violation
on the part of the person individual during the 90-day period
immediately preceding application.
(d) Presented a certification by the parent or guardian that
the person, individual, accompanied by his or her the individual's
licensed parent or legal guardian or, with the permission of the
parent or legal guardian, any licensed driver 21 years of age or
older, has accumulated a total of not less than 50 hours of behind-
the-wheel experience including, except as otherwise provided in
this subdivision, not less than 10 nighttime hours. The nighttime
hours requirement does not apply to a person an individual who has
been issued a graduated driver license that permits daylight
driving only as provided in R 257.3 of the Michigan Administrative
Code.
(e) Successfully completed a secretary of state approved
driving skills test approved by the secretary of state. The
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


secretary of state may enter into an agreement with another public
or private corporation or agency to conduct this driving skills
test. Before the secretary of state authorizes a person an
individual to administer a corporation's or agency's driver skills
testing operations or authorizes an examiner to conduct a driving
skills test, that person individual or examiner must complete both
a state and Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based
criminal history check through the department of state police. This
subdivision applies to a person an individual 16 years of age or
over only if the person individual has satisfied subdivisions (a),
(b), (c), and (d).
(f) Successfully completed a work zone safety course that
meets the requirements of section 309a. The secretary of state must
have received verification, in a form and manner determined by the
department, that the individual has completed the work zone safety
course prior to issuing a level 2 graduated licensing status.
(6) A person An individual issued a level 2 graduated
licensing status under subsection (5) shall remain at level 2 for
not less than 6 months. A person An individual issued a level 2
graduated licensing status under subsection (5) shall not operate a
vehicle under the following circumstances:
(a) Between the hours of 10 p.m. and 5 a.m. This subdivision
does not apply if either of the following applies:
(i) The person individual is accompanied by a parent or legal
guardian or a licensed driver 21 years of age or older designated
by the parent or legal guardian.
(ii) The person individual is operating the vehicle in the
course of his or her the individual's employment or while going to
or from employment or while going to or from an authorized
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


activity.
(b) With more than 1 passenger in the vehicle who is less than
21 years of age. This subdivision does not apply if any of the
following apply:
(i) The person individual is accompanied by a parent or legal
guardian or a licensed driver 21 years of age or older designated
by the parent or legal guardian.
(ii) Any additional passengers who are less than 21 years of
age are members of his or her the individual's immediate family.
(iii) The person individual is operating the vehicle in the
course of his or her the individual's employment or while going to
or from employment or while going to or from an authorized
activity.
(7) The provisions and provisional period described in
subsection (4) or (6) shall must be expanded or extended, or both,
beyond the periods described in subsection (4) or (6) if any of the
following occur and are recorded on the licensee's driving record
during the provisional periods described in subsection (4) or (6)
or any additional periods imposed under this subsection:
(a) A moving violation resulting in a conviction, civil
infraction determination, or probate court disposition.
(b) An accident for which the official police report indicates
a moving violation on the part of the licensee.
(c) A license suspension for a reason other than a mental or
physical disability.
(d) A violation of subsection (4) or (6).
(8) The provisional period described in subsection (4) shall
must be extended under subsection (7) until the licensee completes
90 consecutive days without a moving violation, an accident in
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


which a moving violation resulted, suspension, or provisional
period violation listed in subsection (7), or until age 18,
whichever occurs first. The provisional period described in
subsection (6) shall must be extended under subsection (7) until
the licensee completes 12 consecutive months without a moving
violation, suspension, or restricted period violation listed in
subsection (7) or until age 18, whichever occurs first.
(9) A person An individual who is not less than 17 years of
age may be issued a level 3 graduated licensing status under this
subsection if the person individual has completed 12 consecutive
months without a moving violation, an accident in which a moving
violation resulted, suspension, or restricted period violation
listed in subsection (7) while the person individual was issued a
level 2 graduated licensing status under subsection (5).
(10) Notice shall must be given by first-class mail to the
last known address of a licensee if the provisions are expanded or
extended as described in subsection (7).
(11) A person An individual who violates subsection (4) or (6)
is responsible for a civil infraction.
(12) If a person an individual is determined responsible for a
violation of subsection (4) or (6), the secretary of state shall
send written notification of any conviction or moving violation to
a designated parent or guardian of the person.individual.
(13) For purposes of this section:
(a) Upon On conviction for a moving violation, the date of the
arrest for the violation shall must be used in determining whether
the conviction occurred within a provisional licensure period under
this section.
(b) Upon On entry of a civil infraction determination for a
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


moving violation, the date of issuance of a citation for a civil
infraction shall must be used in determining whether the civil
infraction determination occurred within a provisional licensure
period under this section.
(c) The date of the official police report shall must be used
in determining whether a licensee was driving a motor vehicle
involved in an accident for which the official police report
indicates a moving violation on the part of the licensee or
indicates the licensee had been drinking alcoholic liquor.
(14) A person An individual shall have his or her the
individual's graduated licensing status in his or her the
individual's immediate possession at all times when operating a
motor vehicle, and shall display the card upon on demand of a
police officer. A person An individual who violates this subsection
is responsible for a civil infraction.
(15) As used in this section, "authorized activity" means any
of the following:
(a) A school or a school-sanctioned event or activity. For
purposes of this subdivision, school means a public or private
school, including a home school.
(b) A sporting event or activity, or extracurricular event or
activity, that is not school-sanctioned but that is part of an
official sports league or association or an official
extracurricular club, or that is paid for as a service offered by a
business specializing in those events or activities or training for
those events or activities.
(c) A class or program of vocational instruction offered by a
college, community college, nonprofit association, or unit of
government or by a business specializing in vocational training.
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj


(d) An event or activity sponsored by a religious organization
that is tax-exempt under federal law.
(e) Transporting an individual in need of immediate emergency
care or personal protection to a health care professional,
hospital, police station, domestic violence shelter, or public
safety location.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 5767 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
SCI H06434'26 (H-2) ovm0cj